District of Columbia statutes.
4-1323.01

Missing persons.

(a)

The Child and Family Services Agency shall file a missing person report with the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) for any child in the custody of the Child and Family Services Agency immediately after discovering that the child is missing from the child’s home or out-of-home placement.

(b)

A person required to make a report of abuse or neglect under § 4-1321.02(b) may file a missing person report with the MPD.

(c)

The MPD shall immediately report a missing child to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children if the child has been:

(1)

Deemed critical missing by the MPD, as defined by MPD General Order 304-03; or

(2)

Missing for more than 30 days from the date the Child and Family Services Agency filed a missing person report with MPD pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term “child” means a person who has not attained the age of 18 years.

History

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-276, § 5, 62 DCR 479